src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUNS
  NA ;
  NI ;
@R.Person@  NAD ;
@R.Person@  NID ;

LEXICON NA_SET
@P.Animate.1@   NA_TAG ;

LEXICON NA_TAG
+NA:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NAD_SET
@P.Animate.1@   NAD_TAG ;

LEXICON NAD_TAG
+NAD:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NI_SET
@P.Animate.%0@    NI_TAG ;

LEXICON NI_TAG
+NI:0 N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NID_SET
@P.Animate.%0@   NID_TAG ;

LEXICON NID_TAG
+NID:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON N_PRE_INFL
    N_CON_DIM ;

LEXICON NA
baakwaanaatik:baakwaanaatigo    NA_SET    " 1 staghorn sumac (a type of bush or small tree)" ; !Rand key:n72974659055n
kaadi-gnebik:okaadi-ginebigo    NA_SET    " 1 alligator, crocodile, lizard" ; !Rand key:n73016755007n
nang:anango    NA_SET    " 1 star" ; !Rand key:n71431166389n
wjiik:ojiigw1    NA_SET    " 1 [see jiik]" ; !Rand key:n73072077196n
dgow:digow2   NA_SET    " 1 wave (of water)" ; !Rand key:n73004843262n
nepaajnikesi:nepaajinikesiw2    NA_SET    " 1 mole [i.e. the animal]" ; !Rand key:n71431560625n
n'gamoonini:nVi1gamoowVi1niniw2    NA_SET    " 1 singer (male)" ; !Rand key:n201141010-2-12n
bemdaabaazhwenh:bemidaabaazhweny    NA_SET    " 1 taxi driver" ; !Rand key:n72976552156n
gnigjiinh:ginigijiiny    NA_SET    " 1 carp" ; !Rand key:n73029113012n
mskwaadesiinh:miskwaadesiiny    NA_SET    " 1 mud turtle, painted turtle" ; !Rand key:n71430549419n
wiinnajiinh:wiinanajiiny    NA_SET    " 1 fatso" ; !Rand key:n73034131170n
bebaabgaanh:bebaabVv1gaany    NA_SET    " 1 pancake" ; !Rand key:n72976265968n
mshiimnagaawanzh:mishiimnagaawanzhi1    NA_SET    " 1 apple tree" ; !Rand key:n71430435620n
aanak:aanak    NA_SET    " 1 brown thrasher (a kind of bird)" ; !Rand key:n72973263549n
bgaanens:bagaanens    NA_SET    " 1 peanut" ; !Rand key:n7297662736n
boonse:boonise    NA_SET    " 1 chicken hawk" ; !Rand key:n72980954918n
eshkan:eshkan    NA_SET    " 1 chisel" ; !Rand key:n73015876741n
gnoozhe:ginoozhe    NA_SET    " 1 northern pike" ; !Rand key:n7302929446n
maamaateshiins:maamaateshiins    NA_SET    " 1 firefly" ; !Rand key:n71429143255n
miinens:miinens    NA_SET    " 1 hawthorn berry" ; !Rand key:n71429680847n
naabesmosh:naabesimosh    NA_SET    " 1 male dog" ; !Rand key:n71430661760n
shkiniigkwe:shkiniigikwe    NA_SET    " 1 teenage girl, young woman" ; !Rand key:n73031480001n
zhgashkaandwens:zhagashkaandawens    NA_SET    " 1 white-breasted nuthatch" ; !Rand key:n73033539642n
mtigoons:mitigoons    NA_SET    " 1 bush, shrub, plant smaller than a tree" ; !Rand key:n20114109-48-6n
kwe:ikwew2              NA_SET ; !wag pl, d-hiatus
LEXICON NAD
nwiidgik:%^wiidigikw1    NAD_SET    " 1 my sister [if I am a woman]" ; !Rand key:n73071973177n
niidgik:%^iidigikw1    NAD_SET    " 1 my sister [if I am a woman]" ; !Rand key:n73082447324n
niiw:%^iiw2    NAD_SET    " 1 my wife" ; !Rand key:n73028046620n
ngidik:%^gidigo    NAD_SET    " 1 my knee" ; !Rand key:n73021378064n
ngitziim:%^gitiziim    NAD_SET    " 1 my parent" ; !Rand key:n73024536585n
nbiis-biidiinsim:%^biis-biidiinsim    NAD_SET    " 1 my little chick" ; !Rand key:n72977455023n
nbazgim:%^bazVv1gim    NAD_SET    " 1 my cross-cousin of the opposite sex" ; !Rand key:n72975865167n
ndaan'koobdenh:%^aanikoobideny    NAD_SET    " 1 my great grandchild" ; !Rand key:n72973444896n
ndanwendaagan:%^anawendaagan NAD_SET    " 1 generic term for my cousin, my relative" ; !Rand key:n72989352317n
ndedem:%^dedem    NAD_SET    " 1 my father, my dad" ; !Rand key:n73002754614n
ndinmaangan:%^dinimaangan    NAD_SET    " 1 my shoulder" ; !Rand key:n73004852666n
ndoozhim:%^doozhim    NAD_SET    " 1 my parallel-nephew" ; !Rand key:n73039843723n
ngwis:%^gwis    NAD_SET    " 1 my son" ; !Rand key:n73031736808n
niijkiwenziinh:%^iijkiwenziiny    NAD_SET    " 1 my friend" ; !Rand key:n73028043006n
niinmoshenh:%^iinimosheny    NAD_SET    " 1 my cross-cousin of the opposite sex" ; !Rand key:n73028045345n
nkeweziinyim:%^keweziinyim    NAD_SET    " 1 my husband, my old man" ; !Rand key:n72974456311n
nmisenh:%^miseny    NAD_SET    " 1 my older sister, my older female parallel cousin" ; !Rand key:n71429740558n
nna'aangish:%^nahaangishi1    NAD_SET    " 1 my son-in-law" ; !Rand key:n71431153756n
nniijkewenh:%^niijikeweny    NAD_SET    " 1 my friend" ; !Rand key:n71431756801n
nninjgaans:%^ninjigaans    NAD_SET    " 1 my fin" ; !Rand key:n71432976152n
nooshenh:%^oosheny    NAD_SET    " 1 my grandchild" ; !Rand key:n71435146666n
nwiij-Nishnaabe:%^wiij-anishinaabe    NAD_SET    " 1 my fellow Indian" ; !Rand key:n730720463n
nzigzis:%^zigozis    NAD_SET    " 1 my mother-in-law, my spouse's grandmother (old system), my spouse's cross-aunt (old system)" ; !Rand key:n73035443679n
LEXICON NI
biiwaanak:biwaanago    NI_SET    " 1 arrowhead;  2 flint, pieces of flint" ; !Rand key:n72977485699n
naaknashk:anaakanashko    NI_SET    " 1 bulrush" ; !Rand key:n71430946393n
zaawaabik:zaawaabiko    NI_SET    " 1 brass" ; !Rand key:n73033320874n
bshanzhe'ganeyaatik:bashanzhehiganeyaatigo   NI_SET    " 1 whipstock" ; !Rand key:n72982139769n
mkomiiwgamik:mVi1komiiwigamigo    NI_SET    " 1 ice house, freezer" ; !Rand key:n71429750879n
aamoowgamig:aamoowigamigo    NI_SET    " 1 beehive" ; !Rand key:n201092013-45-24n
sabaap:asabaabi1    NI_SET    " 1 cord, rope, string" ; !Rand key:n73031280391n
memaangsheyaanh:memaangisheyaany    NI_SET    " 1 a type of basket with two ring handles, big-eared basket" ; !Rand key:n71429561413n
goodaagan:goodaagan    NI_SET    " 1 stovepipe" ; !Rand key:n73030423828n
baashkmin'sigan:baashkiminVv1sigan    NI_SET    " 1 jam, preserves; fruit pie filling" ; !Rand key:n72975360644n
Biiwaan'goonying:biiwaanagoonying    NI_SET    " 1 Saginaw Indian Reservation" ; !Rand key:n72977485863n
damnawaagan:odaminawaagan    NI_SET    " 1 doll" ; !Rand key:n72989343362n
gboobjigan:giboobijigan    NI_SET    " 1 bag [with a drawstring]" ; !Rand key:n73019337185n
gzhaabkizgan:gizhaabikizigan    NI_SET    " 1 stove;  2 oven" ; !Rand key:n73031730494n
mdaamnaaboo:mandaaminaaboo    NI_SET    " 1 corn soup" ; !Rand key:n71429465144n
mookdaaswin:mookodaasVa1win    NI_SET    " 1 carpenter's horse, shaving horse" ; !Rand key:n71430356398n
naagan:onaagan    NI_SET    " 1 bowl, dish, plate" ; !Rand key:n71430858047n
nwewin:inwewin    NI_SET    " 1 dialect, language, manner of speaking" ; !Rand key:n71435143918n
dikon:odikon    NI_SET    " 1 branch (of plant, tree)" ; !Rand key:n73032112451n
wzhashk-wiizh:ozhashkw-wiizh    NI_SET    " 1 muskrat lodge" ; !Rand key:n73033167339n
zhiibaawaamjigan:zhiibaawaabanjigan    NI_SET    " 1 [see zhiibaawaabnjigan]" ; !Rand key:n73035131909n
coffeewaaboo:«coffee»waaboo    NI_SET    " 1 coffee" ; !Rand key:n201092111-5-36n
biinaakzigan:biinaakizigan    NI_SET    " 1 laxative" ; !Rand key:n20161148-0-53n
LEXICON NID
n'kan:%^kan    NID_SET    " 1 bone" ; !Rand key:n73017352886n
ngaakgan:%^gaakigan    NID_SET    " 1 my chest" ; !Rand key:n73016049601n
nkanenh:%^kaneny    NID_SET    " 1 bone" ; !Rand key:n71428954160n
ndooskweyaap:%^dooskweyaabi1    NID_SET    " 1 my bloodvein, my vein" ; !Rand key:n73014479731n
nmiinjis:%^miinijis    NID_SET    " 1 a strand of head hair" ; !Rand key:n73097045848n
nnagwenh:%^nagweny    NID_SET    " 1 sleeve" ; !Rand key:n73098540030n
nbwaam:%^bwaam    NID_SET    " 1 thigh" ; !Rand key:n72983854765n
ndazhgan:%^azhigan    NID_SET    " 1 my sock" ; !Rand key:n72974462861n
ndeteg:%^detegw1    NID_SET    " 1 my temple [ref. to side of head];  2 my gills" ; !Rand key:n73003956132n
ndinmaangan:%^dinimaangan    NID_SET    " 1 my shoulder" ; !Rand key:n73004852829n
ndoon:%^doon    NID_SET    " 1 my mouth" ; !Rand key:n73014478979n
ngin'gibeshaagan:%^ginigibeshaagan    NID_SET    " 1 my clitoris" ; !Rand key:n73024536267n
niindip:%^iinindib    NID_SET    " 1 my brain" ; !Rand key:n73028043702n
njiit:%^jiid    NID_SET    " 1 my anus" ; !Rand key:n73028350521n
n'kakon:%^kakon    NID_SET    " 1 my shin" ; !Rand key:n73017352034n
nminik:%^minigo    NID_SET    " 1 my testicle" ; !Rand key:n71429739821n
nnagish:%^nagizhi1    NID_SET    " 1 my intestine" ; !Rand key:n71431151868n
nnibiim:%^nibiim    NID_SET    " 1 my soft spot, my fontanelle [of a baby]" ; !Rand key:n71431661390n
nninjiins:%^ninjiins    NID_SET    " 1 my finger" ; !Rand key:n71432976296n
nweyaan:%^weyaan    NID_SET    " 1 my pelt" ; !Rand key:n73071956576n
nzit:%^zid    NID_SET    " 1 my foot" ; !Rand key:n73035443368n
nwiinendip:%^wiinendib    NID_SET    " 1 my brain" ; !Rand key:n73072043782n
ntawag:%^tawag    NID_SET    " 1 my ear" ; !Rand key:n2010121510-37-14n
